Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-1072
Act, how cited.

Sections 2-1072 to 2-10,117 shall be known and may be cited
as the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB791, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB68, § 1.